California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department shall offer a voluntary repayment agreement procedure to providers that owe a sustained overpayment. A provider may enter into a voluntary repayment agreement with the department to repay a sustained overpayment. The voluntary repayment agreement shall, at a minimum, meet the requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11466.22.

(b) The department shall charge simple interest on the voluntary repayment agreement in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11466.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 95.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.31.

(a) When it has been determined that a provider participating in the AFDC-FC program owes an overpayment that is due and payable, the department may implement involuntary offset collection procedures to collect sustained overpayments from a provider if the provider does not enter into a voluntary repayment agreement with the department or the provider has three outstanding payments on a voluntary repayment agreement before the overpayment is repaid.

(b) The minimum monthly overpayment offset amount from monthly rate reimbursements shall be determined using the involuntary collection procedures developed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 11466.22. Overpayments shall be offset against current monthly
 rate reimbursement payments due and payable to a provider under this chapter.

(c) Failure to repay an overpayment shall be grounds for termination of the provider’s rate and shall result in a referral to the department’s Community Care Licensing Division for license revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 109.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.32.

(a) If a provider that owes a sustained overpayment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 11466.22 does not enter into a voluntary repayment agreement with the department, or the provider has three outstanding payments on a voluntary repayment agreement before the overpayment is repaid, in addition to the monthly overpayment offset amount, 50 percent of any increases resulting from California Necessities Index (CNI) adjustments and provider’s rate adjustments to the standard rate that are due to a provider shall be withheld until the sustained overpayment amount is collected. Once the overpayment amount is collected, the provider shall begin to prospectively receive the full amount of any California Necessities Index and rate adjustment to which it is entitled.

(b) Any provider subject to involuntary repayment of a sustained overpayment pursuant to Section 11466.31 shall be ineligible to receive any rate increase or program change or expansion, until the repayment is completed or until the host county or the primary placement county provide the department with a request for waiver of this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 110.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.33.

(a) If any amount is due and payable to the department as a result of a sustained overpayment to a provider for care and services in the AFDC-FC program, the department may file, in the office of any county clerk of any county in which the provider has real or personal property, a certificate if any of the following conditions are met:

(1) No formal hearing is requested, the provider has not submitted a voluntary repayment agreement with the first payment, and 60 days have elapsed from the notice of audit results.

(2) The provider has not submitted a voluntary repayment agreement
 along with the first payment, 30 days have elapsed after an adverse appeal decision by a hearing officer sustaining an overpayment, and that decision has been adopted by the department or is effective by operation of law.

(b) The certificate provided for pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain:

(1) The amount due, owing, and unpaid, plus simple interest on the amount owing and unpaid beginning on the date the certificate is filed.

(2) A statement that the department has complied with this section prior to the filing of the certificate.

(3) A request that a lien be recorded against the provider in the amount set forth in the certificate.

(c) The county clerk immediately upon the filing of the certificate shall record the lien for the State of California against the provider in the amount set forth in the certificate. The lien may be filed in the chain of title of the property.

(d) The department shall pay the cost of the first lien, and providers shall be responsible for any subsequent liens on a sustained overpayment.

(e) For the first certificate filed by the department pursuant to this section, the county shall waive all filing fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 98.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.34.

(a) (1) At any time within 10 years of the recording of a lien pursuant to Section 11466.33, the department may bring an action, in a superior court in the county in which the lien is filed, seeking a judgment to establish the lien as a judgment lien.

(2) If a judgment is obtained pursuant to paragraph (1), the county recorder shall record the lien as a judgment lien.

(b) An abstract of a judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) or a copy thereof may be recorded with the county recorder of any county. From the time of recording, the judgment shall constitute a
 lien upon all real or personal property of the provider in that county owned by the provider at the time, or that the provider may afterwards, but before the lien expires, acquire. The judgment lien shall continue for 10 years from the time of recording of the abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a), unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(c) The judgment lien may, within 10 years from the date of recording of the abstract of judgment or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner provided in this section, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county. From the date of that recording, the lien shall be extended for 10 years, unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(d) The department may release any lien imposed pursuant to this chapter, at the provider’s cost, in which case any judgment pertaining to that lien is for all purposes null and void, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) No temporary suspension order or license revocation actions by the department’s community care licensing division is pending against a provider.

(2) A provider has made at least three timely payments on a voluntary repayment agreement.

(3) The provider submits to the department corroborative evidence that it is unable to obtain a loan from an institutional lender unless the lien is released.

(e) Execution shall issue upon a
 judgment obtained pursuant to this section upon request of the department in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments. Sale shall be held under that execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section, the director or his or her authorized agents may act on behalf of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 99.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.35.

(a) Any licensee or member of a governing board of a nonprofit who has been determined to owe a sustained overpayment under this chapter, and who, subsequent to notice of the sustained overpayment, has its rate terminated, shall be ineligible to apply or receive a rate for any future program until the overpayment is repaid.

(b) A rate application shall be denied for a provider that meets either of the following conditions:

(1) A provider owing a sustained overpayment under this chapter, upon the occurrence of any additional sustained overpayment, shall be ineligible to apply or
 receive a rate for an existing or future program until the sustained overpayments are repaid, unless a voluntary repayment agreement is approved by the department.

(2) A provider incurring a sustained overpayment that constitutes more than 60 percent of the provider’s annual rate reimbursement shall be ineligible to apply or receive a rate for any existing or future programs until the sustained overpayments are repaid, unless a voluntary repayment agreement is approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 100.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.36.

(a) The department may terminate a program rate or a provider’s eligibility to be paid any rate for a child placed in their care if any of the following conditions are met:

(1) The department determines that, based upon the findings of a hearing officer, a rate application or information submitted by a provider was fraudulently submitted to the department.

(2) A provider is failing to provide services in accordance with the standards associated with its paid rate or in accordance with its program statement.

(3) A provider
 with an outstanding sustained overpayment incurs a second sustained overpayment, and is unable to repay the sustained overpayments.

(4) A provider has a sustained overpayment that represents 100 percent of a provider’s annual rate reimbursement.

(5) A provider has a sustained overpayment and has failed to timely submit its payments on more than three occasions in a 12-month period.

(6) For a provider operating a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community treatment facility, the program or facility is no longer accredited as required by state law.

(b) This chapter shall not be construed to affect the department’s authority under other provisions of law for collection of provider sustained overpayments.

(c) A provider who disagrees with the department’s determination under this section may request an appeal pursuant to Section 11466.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 36.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.5.

The department shall collect cost data and monitor the cost of providing care and supervision, and social work services, to AFDC-FC recipients. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the costs incurred for employee wages and benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 102.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.6.

A provider who disagrees with the rate determined by the department, the rate adjusted by an audit, or a determination made in a management decision letter affecting the rate may request in writing an appeal to the department. The department shall maintain, by regulation, all-county letter, or similar written directive, procedures for the departmental appeal process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 84.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11467.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, with the advice and assistance of the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, research entities, foster youth and advocates for foster youth, foster care provider business entities organized and operated on a nonprofit basis, tribes, and other stakeholders, shall establish a working group to develop performance standards and outcome measures for providers of out-of-home care placements made under the AFDC-FC program, including, but not limited to, foster family agency, group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, and THP-Plus providers, and for the effective and efficient administration of the AFDC-FC program.

(b) (1) The performance standards and outcome measures shall employ the applicable performance standards and outcome measures as set forth in Sections 11469 to 11469.3, inclusive, designed to identify the degree to which foster care providers, including business entities organized and operated on a nonprofit basis, are providing out-of-home placement services that meet the needs of foster children, and the degree to which these services are supporting improved outcomes, including those identified by the California Child and Family Service Review System.

(2) Providers shall maintain, for licensing, ratesetting, and placement purposes, program statements, as required pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and all applicable written directives and regulations adopted by the department.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until the enactment of applicable state law, or October 1, 2015, whichever is earlier, the department may implement the changes made pursuant to this section through all-county letters, or similar instructions from the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 37.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11467.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that standards be developed to address the specific needs of very young children, from birth to six years of age, experiencing the trauma of separation from their family who must be placed in out-of-home care. These standards shall provide normative guidelines differentiated by the needs specific to infants from birth to two years of age, toddlers from two years of age to four years of age, and preschool from four years of age to six years of age and shall reflect the needs of all children for a family-like setting that provides culturally appropriate nurturing, and safety.

(b) The department shall assess
 the needs of young children and adopt standards in consultation with interested parties that shall include the following:

(1) A representative of a public interest law firm specializing in children’s issues.

(2) A representative of an advocacy group representing children with developmental disabilities.

(3) A representative of the California Association of Children’s Homes.

(4) A representative of the Association for Minority Adolescents in Residential Care Homes.

(5) A representative of the California Association of Services for Children.

(6) A representative of the County Welfare Directors Association.

(7) A representative of the National Association of Social Workers.

(8) A developmental psychologist specializing in children in shelter care.

(9) A psychiatrist specializing in the emotional development of young children.

(10) A pediatrician.

(11) An expert in family reunification issues.

(12) A specialist in the treatment of alcohol and other drug abuse.

(13) A representative of the Child
 Welfare League of America.

(14) A representative of the State Department of Developmental Services.

(15) A representative of the Association of Regional Center Agencies.

(c) The department shall develop standards that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The elements of a safe nurturing environment that support all aspects of a child’s development and provide opportunities to establish primary, trusting relationships with a carefully limited number of adults.

(2) Psychosocial needs, primary care, parental visits, developmental support, trauma recovery, appropriate
 discipline, and flexibility in daily activities.

(3) Guidelines for services to be provided pursuant to a case plan.

(4) To the maximum extent feasible, the requirement that significant placement changes be minimized, and that they be carefully planned and implemented.

(d) The standards shall be incorporated to the extent feasible into provider program statements required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 86.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.

The department shall establish and maintain administrative procedures to review the rate set by the department for AFDC-FC programs, including, but not limited to, group homes, short-term residential therapeutic programs, and foster family agencies that provide treatment services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 111.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.1.

The administrative review procedure for rates established pursuant to Section 11468 shall include a protest within the department and a hearing conducted by a hearing officer appointed by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 87.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.2.

(a) A provider who disagrees with a rate determination and who desires a different rate, or who has been denied a rate or had a rate terminated, may file a protest with the department within 60 days from the date of the mailing of the notification of the set rate. The protest shall include all information including documentation for the department to determine the provider’s basis for requesting a different set rate or challenge of the audit findings that affect the rate. The department may request additional documentation or information from the provider after reviewing the protest.

(b) Within 90 days of receipt of the final documentation or information,
 the department shall issue a decision letter indicating the department’s decision on the protest which shall include the department’s basis for the action taken. This time period may be extended by the department for good cause.

(c) If the provider does not concur with the rate protest decision letter, a written appeal may be filed with the department within 60 days of receipt of the decision letter. The appeal shall be accompanied with full supporting documentation. The department may request additional information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 88.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.3.

(a) The appeal filed with the department pursuant to Section 11468.2 shall specify whether the provider does or does not wish that an informal conference among the parties be held, together with the reasons therefor. Either party may request, or the hearing officer may order, that a telephone conference call be initiated among the parties for discussion of the advisability of conducting an informal conference. The hearing officer shall decide whether an informal conference would be appropriate and notify the parties of this decision in writing.

(b) If the hearing officer determines that an informal conference is appropriate, it shall be ordered and scheduled as soon as reasonably possible. The hearing officer shall preside at this informal conference.

(c) The department shall mail written notice of the time and place of the informal conference to each party at least 10 calendar days before the date of the informal conference. This period may be shortened with the consent of the parties. Any party may waive notice.

(d) Efforts shall be made to resolve the facts and issues in dispute in a fair and equitable manner, subject to the requirements of state and federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 9.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.4.

(a) The hearing regarding a rate held pursuant to Section 11468.1 shall be conducted no later than 180 days after the filing of a timely and specific statement of disputed issues by the provider.

(b) The hearing officer shall take the matter under submission at the conclusion of the hearing. A proposed decision, in a form that may be adopted as the decision of the department, shall be submitted to the department within 180 days after the closure of the record.

(c) Within 120 days after submission of the hearing officer’s proposed decision, the department shall:

(1) Adopt the proposed decision with or without reading or hearing the record.

(2) Reject the proposed decision and adopt an alternative decision based upon the documentary and electronically recorded record, with or without taking additional evidence.

(3) Refer the matter to the same or a different hearing officer to take additional evidence. If the case is so assigned, the hearing officer shall, within 90 days, prepare a proposed decision, based upon the additional evidence and the documentary and electronically recorded record of the prior hearing. The department may then take one of the actions described in subdivision (c) in regard to the new proposed decision. The department may return a proposed decision only
 twice on the same appeal.

(d) (1) The department’s decision shall be final when the decision is mailed to the parties. However, the department retains jurisdiction to correct clerical errors.

(2) Copies of the final decision of the department, and the hearing officer’s proposed decision if it was not adopted by the department, shall be mailed by certified mail to the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 89.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11468.5.

The provider may request review of the final decision of the department made pursuant to Section 11468.4 in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, within six months of the issuance of the director’s final decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 90.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11469.

(a) The department shall develop, following consultation with group home providers, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the State Department of Health Care Services, and stakeholders, performance standards and outcome measures for determining the effectiveness of the care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, provided by group homes under the AFDC-FC program pursuant to Sections 11460 and 11462. These standards shall be designed to measure group home program performance for the client group that the group home program is designed to serve.

(1) The performance standards and outcome measures shall be designed
 to measure the performance of group home programs in areas over which the programs have some degree of influence, and in other areas of measurable program performance that the department can demonstrate are areas over which group home programs have meaningful managerial or administrative influence.

(2) These standards and outcome measures shall include, but are not limited to, the effectiveness of services provided by each group home program, and the extent to which the services provided by the group home assist in obtaining the child welfare case plan objectives for achieving the desired outcomes in safety, permanency, and well-being for the child.

(3) In addition, when the group home provider has identified as part of its program for licensing, ratesetting, or county placement purposes, or has included as a part of a child’s case plan by mutual agreement between the group home
 and the placing agency, specific mental health, education, medical, and other child-related services, the performance standards and outcome measures may also measure the effectiveness of those services.

(b) Regulations regarding the implementation of the group home performance standards system required by this section shall be adopted no later than one year prior to implementation. The regulations shall specify both the performance standards system and the manner by which the AFDC-FC rate of a group home program shall be adjusted if performance standards are not met.

(c) Effective July 1, 1995, group home performance standards shall be
 implemented.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the group home program performance standards system shall not be implemented prior to the implementation of the AFDC-FC performance standards system.

(e) On or before January 1, 2016, the department shall develop, following consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, research entities, foster children, advocates for foster children, foster care provider business entities organized and operated on a nonprofit basis, Indian tribes, and other stakeholders, additional performance standards and outcome measures that require group homes to implement programs and services to minimize law enforcement contacts and delinquency petition filings arising from incidents of allegedly unlawful behavior by minors occurring in
 group homes or under the supervision of group home staff, including individualized behavior management programs, emergency intervention plans, and conflict resolution processes.

(f) On or before January 1, 2017, the department shall develop, following consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Medical Board of California, research entities, foster children advocates for foster children, foster care provider business entities organized and operated on a nonprofit basis, Indian tribes, and other stakeholders, additional performance standards and outcome measures that require group homes and short-term residential therapeutic programs to implement alternative programs and services, including individualized behavior management programs,
 emergency intervention plans, and conflict resolution processes.

(g) Performance standards and outcome measures developed pursuant to this section shall apply to short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(h) The department shall develop and implement a technical assistance and support plan, in consultation with the stakeholders identified in subdivision (a), that utilizes the performance standards and outcome measures to identify and assist low performing providers.

(i) The department shall coordinate with other state agencies, and may execute agreements as necessary, to obtain data necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 40.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11469.1.

The performance standards and outcome measures required by Section 11469 shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) They shall include indicators of quality of care, including, but not limited to, stability of placement, reduction in recidivism, educational progress, and improvement in social behavior, and shall not consist solely of fiscal indicators, such as cost-avoidance due to reduction or avoidance of out-of-home care.

(b) They shall apply to all providers of out-of-home care, including, but not limited to, providers of services provided either directly by, or under contract with, a county welfare department or county probation department.

(c) They shall be used to develop baseline standards against which to measure future performance and to provide a basis for making comparisons among different programs and placements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 950, Sec. 7.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11469.2.

(a) The department shall develop, following consultation with foster family agency providers, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the State Department of Health Care Services, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, and stakeholders, performance standards and outcome measures for determining the effectiveness of the care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, provided to children in out-of-home family based care placements pursuant to Sections 11460 and 11463 and Chapter 6.3 (commencing with Section 18360) of Part 6. These standards shall be designed
 to measure outcomes for the client and the performance of programs in areas over which the service provider or a county acting in the capacity of, or is licensed as, a service provider has meaningful managerial or administrative influence.

(1) These standards and outcome measures shall include, but are not limited to, the effectiveness of services provided by each program, and the extent to which the services provided by the programs assist in obtaining the child welfare case plan objectives for achieving the desired outcomes in safety, permanency, and well-being for the child.

(2) In addition, when the provider has identified as part of its program for licensing, ratesetting, or county placement purposes, or has included as a part of a child’s case plan by mutual agreement between
 the program and the placing agency, specific mental health, education, medical, and other child-related services, the performance standards and outcome measures may also measure the effectiveness of those services.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), these performance standards and outcome measures shall be set forth in written directives until regulations are adopted.

(c) The department shall develop and implement a technical assistance and support plan, in consultation with stakeholders identified in subdivision (a), that utilizes the performance standards and outcome measures to identify and assist low performing service providers.

(d) The department shall coordinate with other state agencies, and may execute agreements as necessary, to obtain data necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 93.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11469.3.

The performance standards and outcome measures required by Section 11469.2 shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) They shall include indicators of quality of care, including, but not limited to, stability of placement, reduction in recidivism, educational progress, and improvement in social behavior, and shall not consist solely of fiscal indicators, such as cost-avoidance due to reduction or avoidance of out-of-home care.

(b) They shall apply to providers of services provided either directly by, or under contract with, a county welfare department or county probation department.

(c) They shall be used to develop baseline standards against which to measure future performance and to provide a basis for making comparisons among different programs and placements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 94.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Enforcement [11476.6. - 11487.5.]

11476.6.

Each local child support agency shall submit to the department data revealing the range and median time periods by which notification of the receipt of child support payments collected on behalf of a family receiving aid under this chapter is made to the local welfare department. The data shall contain the number and percentage of cases in which the payments described herein are conveyed within the time period prescribed by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 235.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.

As a condition of eligibility for aid paid under this chapter, each applicant or recipient shall do all of the following:

(a) (1) Do either of the following:

(A) For applications received before October 1, 2009, assign to the county any rights to support from any other person the applicant or recipient may have on their own behalf or on behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant or recipient is applying for or receiving aid, not exceeding the total amount of cash assistance provided to
 the family under this chapter. Receipt of public assistance under this chapter operates as an assignment by operation of law. An assignment of support rights to the county shall also constitute an assignment to the state. If support rights are assigned pursuant to this subdivision, the assignee may become an assignee of record by the local child support agency or other public official filing with the court clerk an affidavit showing that an assignment has been made or that there has been an assignment by operation of law. This procedure does not limit any other means by which the assignee may become an assignee of record.

(B) For applications received on or after October 1, 2009, assign to the county any rights to support from any other person the applicant or recipient may have on
 their own behalf, or on behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant or recipient is applying for or receiving aid. The assignment shall apply only to support that accrues during the period of time that the applicant is receiving assistance under this chapter, and shall not exceed the total amount of cash assistance provided to the family under this chapter. Receipt of public assistance under this chapter shall operate as an assignment by operation of law. An assignment of support rights to the county shall also constitute an assignment to the state. If support rights are assigned pursuant to this subdivision, the assignee may become an assignee of record by the local child support agency or other public official filing with the court clerk an affidavit showing that an assignment has been made or that there has been an assignment by operation of law. This procedure does not limit any other means by which the assignee may become an assignee of record.

(2) Support that has been assigned pursuant to paragraph (1) and that accrues while the family is receiving aid under this chapter shall be permanently assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(3) If the federal government does not permit states to adopt the same order of distribution for preassistance and postassistance child support arrears that are assigned on or after October 1, 1998, support arrears that accrue before the family receives aid under this chapter that are assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall be assigned as follows:

(A) Child support assigned prior to January 1, 1998, shall be permanently assigned until aid is no longer received and the entire amount of aid has been reimbursed.

(B) Child support assigned on
 or after January 1, 1998, but prior to October 1, 2000, shall be temporarily assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received and the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed or until October 1, 2000, whichever comes first.

(C) On or after October 1, 2000, support assigned pursuant to this subdivision that was not otherwise permanently assigned shall be temporarily assigned to the county until aid is no longer received.

(D) On or after October 1, 2000, support that was temporarily assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall, when a payment is received from the federal tax intercept program, be temporarily assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(4) If the federal government permits states to adopt the same order of distribution for preassistance and postassistance child
 support arrears, child support arrears shall be assigned, as follows:

(A) Child support assigned pursuant to this subdivision prior to October 1, 1998, shall be assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received and the entire amount has been reimbursed.

(B) On or after October 1, 1998, child support assigned pursuant to this subdivision that accrued before the family receives aid under this chapter and that was not otherwise permanently assigned shall be temporarily assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received.

(C) On or after October 1, 1998, support that was temporarily assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall, when a payment is received from the federal tax intercept program, be temporarily assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(b) (1) Cooperate with the county welfare department and local child support agency in establishing the paternity of a child of the applicant or recipient born out of wedlock with respect to whom aid is claimed, and in establishing, modifying, or enforcing a support order with respect to a child of the individual for whom aid is requested or obtained, unless the applicant or recipient qualifies for a good cause exception pursuant to Section 11477.04. The granting of aid shall not be delayed or denied if the applicant is otherwise eligible, completes the necessary forms, and agrees to cooperate with the local child support agency in securing support and determining paternity, if applicable. The local child support agency shall have staff available, in person or by telephone, at all county welfare offices and shall conduct an interview with each applicant to obtain information necessary to establish paternity and establish,
 modify, or enforce a support order at the time of the initial interview with the welfare office. The local child support agency shall make the determination of cooperation. If the applicant or recipient attests under penalty of perjury that they
 cannot provide the information required by this subdivision, the local child support agency shall make a finding regarding whether the individual could reasonably be expected to provide the information before the local child support agency determines whether the individual is cooperating. In making the finding, the local child support agency shall consider all of the following:

(A) The age of the child for whom support is sought.

(B) The circumstances surrounding the conception of the child.

(C) The age or mental capacity of the parent or caretaker of the child for whom aid is being sought.

(D) The time that has elapsed since the parent or caretaker last had contact with the alleged father or obligor.

(2) Cooperation includes all of the following:

(A) Providing the name of the alleged parent or obligor and other information about that person if known to the applicant or recipient, such as address, social security number, telephone number, place of employment or school, and the names and addresses of relatives or associates.

(B) Appearing at interviews, hearings, and legal proceedings, provided the applicant or recipient is provided with reasonable advance notice of the interview, hearing, or legal proceeding and does not have good cause not to appear.

(C) If paternity is at issue, submitting to genetic tests, including genetic testing of the child, if necessary.

(D) Providing any
 additional information known to, or reasonably obtainable by, the applicant or recipient necessary to establish paternity or to establish, modify, or enforce a child support order.

(3) A recipient or applicant shall not be required to sign a voluntary declaration of paternity, as set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7570) of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Family Code, as a condition of cooperation.

(c) (1) This section does not apply if all of the adults are excluded from the assistance unit pursuant to Section 11251.3, 11454, or 11486.5, or if all eligible adults have been subject to Section 11327.5 for at least 12 consecutive months.